Illinois, session 104th, HB3704.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-135.5-35 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-135.5-35)7    Sec. 11-135.5-35. Revenues; rates; costs; construction 8contracts.9    (a) Revenue fund. Whenever bonds are issued under this 10Division, the revenue received from the operation of the 11properties under the control of the commission shall be set 12aside as collected and deposited in a separate fund to be used 13only (1) in paying the cost of the operation and maintenance of 14those properties, (2) in providing an adequate depreciation 15fund, (3) in paying the principal of and interest upon the 16revenue bonds issued by the commission, as provided by this 17Division, (4) to comply with the covenants of the ordinance or 18resolution, or the master trust indenture or any applicable 19supplemental trust indenture or both, authorizing the issuance 20of such bonds, and (5) to carry out the corporate purposes and 21powers of the commission.22    (b) Rates and charges for waterworks system. If the 23commission has charge of the operation of a complete   HB3704- 2 -LRB104 09883 RTM 19952 b1waterworks system, including the distribution mains, the 2commission shall establish rates and charges for water and the 3use of commission waterworks system facilities, which shall be 4sufficient at all times to pay the cost of operation and 5maintenance, to provide an adequate depreciation fund, to pay 6the principal of and interest upon all revenue bonds issued as 7provided by this Division, to comply with the covenants of the 8ordinance or resolution, or the master trust indenture or any 9applicable supplemental trust indenture or both, authorizing 10the issuance of such bonds, and to carry out the corporate 11purposes and powers of the commission. Charges and rates shall 12be established, revised, and maintained by ordinance and 13become payable as the commission may determine by ordinance.14    (c) Rates and charges for water source of supply. If the 15commission has charge of the operation of a common source of 16supply of water, the municipalities represented by the 17commission shall contract with the commission for water. These 18municipalities shall establish such charges and rates for 19water supplied by them to consumers as will be sufficient at 20all times (1) to pay the cost of operation and maintenance of 21the respective waterworks systems (or combined waterworks and 22sewerage systems) of the municipalities, (2) to provide an 23adequate depreciation fund therefor, (3) to pay the principal 24of and interest on all revenue bonds of the municipalities 25payable from the revenues of the waterworks system (or 26combined waterworks and sewerage system), and (4) to pay the   HB3704- 3 -LRB104 09883 RTM 19952 b1charges and rates established by the commission for the sale 2of water by the commission to, and the use of commission 3waterworks system facilities by, those municipalities. The 4commission shall establish such charges and rates for water 5supplied to those municipalities and the use of commission 6waterworks system facilities as will be sufficient at all 7times (1) to pay the cost of operation and maintenance of the 8common source of supply of water, (2) to provide an adequate 9depreciation fund therefor, (3) to pay the principal of and 10interest on the revenue bonds issued by the commission, (4) to 11comply with the covenants of the ordinance or resolution, or 12the master trust indenture or any applicable supplemental 13trust indenture or both, authorizing the issuance of such 14bonds, and (5) to carry out the corporate purposes and powers 15of the commission, under the provisions of this Division. 16Contracts entered into between the commission and the 17specified municipalities shall include covenants for the 18establishment of rates and charges as provided in this 19Section.20    (d) Pension costs. Contributions to a retirement fund or 21other pension alternative authorized by the Illinois Pension 22Code, including, without limitation, the Illinois Municipal 23Retirement Fund, by commissions created under this Division 24which have been included under the retirement fund or other 25pension alternative shall be considered a cost of operation 26and maintenance for the purposes of this Section.  HB3704- 4 -LRB104 09883 RTM 19952 b1    (e) Enforcement of obligations. An owner of a bond issued 2under this Division, a trustee under a master trust indenture 3or supplemental trust indenture or both with respect to the 4bonds issued under this Division, or both the owner and 5trustee may, in a civil action, mandamus action, or other 6proceeding, enforce and compel performance of all duties 7required by this Division to be performed by such a commission 8or by any of the municipalities, including the making of rates 9and charges, the collecting of sufficient revenue, and the 10application thereof, as provided in this Division.11    (f) Construction contracts. All or any portion of a 12waterworks system or other public improvement of such a 13commission, when the expense thereof will exceed the greater 14of (i) $25,000 or (ii) the amount of expense above which a work 15or public improvement by a municipality must be let to the 16lowest responsible bidder after advertising for bids under 17Section 8-9-1 of this Code, shall be constructed, maintained, 18or repaired either: (1) by a contract let to the lowest 19responsible bidder after advertising for bids, in the manner 20prescribed by the commission's bylaws, rules, and regulations 21and by the vote required as established in the 22intergovernmental agreement pursuant to Section 11-135.5-25; 23or (2) without advertising for bids, if authorized by a vote of 24greater than a majority of all the commissioners as 25established in the intergovernmental agreement pursuant to 26Section 11-135.5-25. The commission's bylaws, rules, and   HB3704- 5 -LRB104 09883 RTM 19952 b1regulations shall provide for an alternative procedure for 2emergency procurement if an emergency makes it impracticable 3to follow the procedures in this subsection.4    (g) Alternative project delivery. A commission may use 5alternative project delivery methods if the commission 6determines it to be in the commission's best interest for a 7particular project. An alternative project delivery method may 8include, without limitation, design-build or 9construction-manager-at-risk. All notices for the procurement 10of goods, services, or work to be provided pursuant to an 11alternate delivery method shall include all requirements for 12the goods, services, or work to be procured. All awards of 13contracts or agreements for the procurement of goods, 14services, or work to be provided pursuant to an alternate 15delivery method shall be made on the basis of demonstrated 16competence and qualifications and with due regard for the 17principles of competitive selection. As part of an alternate 18project delivery procurement process, prior to submission of 19proposals, the commission may conduct meetings and exchange 20confidential information with proposers to promote 21understanding of the request for proposals, review alternative 22design concepts, or discuss other issues related to the 23procurement. 24    As used in this subsection: 25    "Construction-manager-at-risk" means a delivery method in 26which the party proposing to be the construction manager   HB3704- 6 -LRB104 09883 RTM 19952 b1commits to be responsible for performance of certain 2preconstruction services and, if the parties reach agreement 3on key terms, becomes responsible for construction of the 4project.5    "Design-build" means a delivery method that provides 6responsibility within a single contract for furnishing the 7architectural, engineering, land-surveying, and related 8services for the project, as well as the labor, materials, 9equipment, and other construction services for the project.10    (h) Procurement goals and requirements. A commission may 11establish goals or requirements for the procurement of goods 12and services and for construction contracts to promote and 13encourage the continuing economic development of (i) 14businesses that are owned and operated by minorities, women, 15persons with disabilities, or veterans; (ii) businesses that 16are located within the territory of one or more of the 17municipalities that are members of the commission; (iii) 18businesses that employ persons who reside in the territory of 19one or more of the municipalities that are members of the 20commission; (iv) businesses that are located within the 21territory of a municipality having more than 2,000,000 22inhabitants in which a portion of the commission's waterworks 23system or other commission improvement is located; or (v) 24businesses that employ persons who reside in the territory of 25a municipality having more than 2,000,000 inhabitants in which 26a portion of the commission's waterworks system or other   HB3704- 7 -LRB104 09883 RTM 19952 b1commission improvement is located.2    A commission may also establish other goals or 3requirements that result in the award to a responsible bidder 4other than the lowest responsible bidder if the commission 5determines that the award is in the commission's best 6interests, notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (f). 7Goals or requirements that are set by a commission that result 8in a preference being applied to a bidder or proposer, who has 9met those goals or requirements, in a commission's process for 10awarding construction contracts and for the procurement of 11goods and services must comply with the constitutional 12standards applicable to the preferences. 13    (i) Contract assignment. A member municipality may enter 14into a contract for any portion of a waterworks system or other 15public improvement of a commission pursuant to a contracting 16method that is consistent with the requirements applicable to 17the municipality and generally consistent with the principles 18in subsection (f) or (g). The commission may accept assignment 19of such a contract and of payment obligations under that 20contract. 21    (j) Project labor agreement. In connection with a contract 22by a commission for the construction of all or any portion of a 23waterworks system or other public improvement of the 24commission, the commission must enter into a project labor 25agreement with the applicable local building trades council or 26the applicable local buildings trades council must enter into   HB3704- 8 -LRB104 09883 RTM 19952 b1a project labor agreement with the general contractor selected 2by the commission prior to the commencement of any and all 3construction, building, renovation, demolition, or any 4material change to the structure or land.5(Source: P.A. 102-684, eff. 12-16-21; 102-1134, eff. 2-10-23.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.